Oklahoma, session 2025, SB867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.545, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.545. A. Except as otherwise provided, as part of


the accountability system developed as provided for in Section


1210.541 of this title, the State Board of Education shall prepare


annual reports of the results of the Oklahoma School Testing Program


which describe student achievement in the state, and each school


site, pursuant to the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965


(ESEA) as reauthorized by P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every


Student Succeeds Act (ESSA), and any related federal regulations.



Req. No. 1204 Page 1


B. The annual report as required pursuant to subsection A of


this section shall identify school sites as having one of the


following grades for each indicator, separately, and by a single


overview grade of all indicators, defined according to rules of the


State Board of Education:


1. “A” means schools making excellent progress;


2. “B” means schools making above average progress;


3. “C” means schools making satisfactory progress;


4. “D” means schools making less than satisfactory progress;


and


5. “F” means schools failing to make adequate progress.


C. Each school that has students who are tested and included in


the school grading system as provided for in this section shall


receive a school grade, except as follows:


1. A school shall not receive a school grade if the number of


students tested and included in the school grading system is less


than the minimum sample size necessary for statistical reliability


and prevention of the unlawful release of personally identifiable


student data. The State Board of Education is directed to establish


the lowest minimum sample size necessary to meet the requirements of


this paragraph; and


2. The academic performance of students who are enrolled full-


time in an online program that is offered by a school district or


charter school that is not the district of residence or is not

Req. No. 1204 Page 2


located in the district of residence of the student shall be


reported separately by the school district or charter school and


shall not be included when determining the grade of the school site


or charter school.


D. The State Board of Education may adopt alternate systems of


accountability for statewide virtual charter schools, alternative


education programs as defined in Section 1210.568 of this title, and


schools serving only grades prekindergarten or kindergarten through


two.


E. The grade of a school shall be based on a multimeasures


approach to accountability in accordance with the Elementary and


Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA) as reauthorized by P.L. No.


114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) and any


federal regulations that include, but are not limited to, the


following indicators:


1. Statewide assessments, including the establishment of


student performance bands;


2. Graduation rates for high schools;


3. Statewide academic measures for elementary and middle


schools;


4. English language proficiency for English learners; and


5. At least one additional statewide measure of school quality


or student success, including, but not limited to, school climate,



Req. No. 1204 Page 3


school safety, student engagement, educator engagement, and/or


advanced coursework and postsecondary readiness.


F. Of the indicators included in subsection E of this section,


not less than seventy percent (70%) of the overview grade must be


given to indicators 1, 2, 3, and 4 and, in the aggregate, with not


more than thirty percent (30%) of the grade given to indicator 5.


G. Further, the grade of an elementary or middle school site


shall include, but not be limited to, a measure of status for


English language arts (ELA), math, and science, growth in ELA and


math, English Language Proficiency Assessment language proficiency


assessment (ELPA) progress, and chronic absenteeism.


H. The grade of a high school site shall include, but not be


limited to, a measure of status for English language arts (ELA),


math, and science status, English Language Proficiency Assessment


language proficiency assessment (ELPA) progress, graduation rate,


chronic absenteeism, and postsecondary opportunities. For purposes


of this section, postsecondary opportunities shall include Advanced


Placement advanced placement, International Baccalaureate, dual and


concurrent enrollment, internships, mentorships and apprenticeships,


and industry certifications. The Board shall adopt a time line


timeline for moving from completion of such opportunities to


crediting achievement of such opportunities.


I. The annual report shall identify the performance of each


school as having improved, remained the same, or declined. This

Req. No. 1204 Page 4


school improvement rating shall be based on a comparison of the


student and school performance data of the current year to the


previous year data.


J. 1. The State Department of Education shall annually develop


a school site report card to be delivered to parents throughout each


school district. The report card shall be in accordance with the


requirements of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965


(ESEA), as reauthorized and amended by P.L. No. 114-95, also known


as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) and includes the grade for


the school, information regarding school improvement, an explanation


of school performance, and indicators of return on investment. The


report card for each school site shall be published annually by the


Department on its website, and every school district shall provide


the school site report card to the parent or guardian of each


student enrolled in the school site. In order to provide


information regarding school performance for school report cards


issued during the 2016-2017 and 2017-2018 school year, the


Department shall include an explanation of the changes to the


statewide system of student assessments as required in Section


1210.508 of this title and how the transition in assessments may


impact school performance. The Department shall issue school report


cards using the 2016-2017 school year assessment data that is


available.



Req. No. 1204 Page 5


2. The school site report card published on the Department’s


website and provided to the parent or guardian of each student


enrolled in the school site pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall include a minimum of five (5) indicators of


enrichment and support opportunities such as the following:


a. programs offered for gifted and talented students,


b. foreign language course offerings,


c. whether the school site has an active parent teacher


association or parent teacher organization,


d. science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM)


course offerings,


e. intergenerational programming offerings,


f. apprenticeship, internship, and mentorship offerings,


g. before-school and after-school programming


availability,


h. extracurricular activities available, and


i. mental health support.


3. The school site report card published on the Department’s


website and provided to the parent or guardian of each student


enrolled in the school site pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall include a minimum of three indicators of staffing


experience and retention such as the following:


a. the percentage of teachers with more than three (3)


years of teaching experience,

Req. No. 1204 Page 6


b. the percentage of teachers who have been employed by


the school site for more than three (3) years,


c. the percentage of teachers with National Board


certification or post-graduate degrees,


d. the percentage of teachers with an emergency or


provisional certificate, as provided for in Section 6-


187 of this title,


e. the percentage of teachers who are adjunct teachers,


as provided for in Section 6-122.3 of this title, and


f. the length of time the school site principal has been


in his or her position.


K. The Legislature may factor in the performance of schools in


calculating any performance-based funding policy that is provided to


public school districts.


L. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1204 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:54 AM



Req. No. 1204 Page 7